Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Informal Probate and Appointment Proceedings.

Sec. 13.16.080.
Informal probate or appointment proceedings; application; contents.

Applications for informal probate or informal appointment shall be directed to the registrar, and verified by the applicant to be accurate and complete to the best of the applicant’s knowledge and belief as to the following information:

every application for informal probate of a will or for informal appointment of a personal representative other than a special or successor representative, must contain the following:

a statement of the interest of the applicant;

the name and age of the decedent, the date of death of the decedent, the judicial district and state of the decedent’s domicile at the time of death, and the names and addresses of the spouse, children, heirs, and devisees and the ages of any who are minors so far as known or ascertainable with reasonable diligence by the applicant;

if the decedent was not domiciled in the state at the time of death, a statement showing venue;

a statement identifying and indicating the address of any personal representative of the decedent appointed in this state or elsewhere whose appointment has not been terminated;

a statement indicating whether the applicant has received a demand for notice, or is aware of any demand for notice of any probate or appointment proceeding concerning the decedent that may have been filed in this state or elsewhere;

a statement that the time limit for informal probate as provided in AS

13.16.080

—

13.16.130

has not expired either because three years or less have passed since the decedent’s death, or, if more than three years from death have passed, that circumstances as described by AS

13.16.040

authorizing tardy probate or appointment have occurred;

an application for informal probate of a will must state the following in addition to the statements required by (1) of this subsection:

that the original of the decedent’s last will is in the possession of the court, or accompanies the application, or that an authenticated copy of a will probated in another jurisdiction accompanies the application;

that the applicant, to the best of the applicant’s knowledge, believes the will to have been validly executed;

that after the exercise of reasonable diligence, the applicant is unaware of any instrument revoking the will, and that the applicant believes that the instrument that is the subject of the application is the decedent’s last will;

an application for informal appointment of a personal representative to administer an estate under a will must describe the will by date of execution and state the time and place of probate or the pending application or petition for probate; the application for appointment must adopt the statements in the application or petition for probate and state the name, address, and priority for appointment of the person whose appointment is sought;

an application for informal appointment of an administrator in intestacy must state in addition to the statements required by (1) of this subsection:

that after the exercise of reasonable diligence the applicant is unaware of any unrevoked testamentary instrument relating to property having a situs in this state under AS

13.06.060

, or a statement why any such instrument of which the applicant may be aware is not being probated;

the priority of the person whose appointment is sought and the names of any other persons having a prior or equal right to the appointment under AS

13.16.065

;

an application for appointment of a personal representative to succeed a personal representative appointed under a different testacy status must refer to the order in the most recent testacy proceeding, state the name and address of the person whose appointment is sought and of the person whose appointment will be terminated if the application is granted, and describe the priority of the applicant;

an application for appointment of a personal representative to succeed a personal representative who has tendered a resignation as provided in AS

13.16.290(c)

, or whose appointment has been terminated by death or removal, must adopt the statements in the application or petition that led to the appointment of the person being succeeded except as specifically changed or corrected, state the name and address of the person who seeks appointment as successor, and describe the priority of the applicant.

By verifying an application for informal probate or informal appointment, the applicant submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding for relief from fraud relating to the application, or for perjury, that may be instituted against the applicant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 12 ch 56 SLA 1973; am § 12 ch 154 SLA 1976)

Sec. 13.16.085.
Informal probate; duty of registrar; effect of informal probate.

Upon receipt of an application requesting informal probate of a will, the registrar, upon making the findings required by AS

13.16.090

, shall issue a written statement of informal probate if at least 120 hours have elapsed since the decedent’s death.
Informal probate is conclusive as to all persons until superseded by an order in a formal testacy proceeding.
No defect in the application or procedure relating to it that leads to informal probate of a will renders the probate void.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.090.
Informal probate; proof and findings required.

In an informal proceeding for original probate of a will, the registrar shall determine whether

the application is complete;

the applicant has made oath or affirmation that the statements contained in the application are true to the best of the applicant’s knowledge and belief;

the applicant appears from the application to be an interested person as defined in AS

13.06.050

;

on the basis of the statements in the application, venue is proper;

an original, duly executed and apparently unrevoked will is in the registrar’s possession;

any notice required by AS

13.16.070

has been given and that the application is not within AS

13.16.095

; and

it appears from the application that the time limit for original probate has not expired.

The application shall be denied if it indicates that a personal representative has been appointed in another judicial district of this state or, except as provided in (d) of this section, if it appears that this or another will of the decedent has been the subject of a previous probate order.

A will that appears to have the required signatures and that contains an attestation clause showing that requirements of execution under AS

13.12.502

or

13.12.506

have been met shall be probated without further proof. In other cases, the registrar may assume execution if the will appears to have been properly executed, or the registrar may accept a sworn statement or affidavit of a person having knowledge of the circumstances of execution, whether or not the person was a witness to the will.

Informal probate of a will that has been previously probated elsewhere may be granted at any time upon written application by any interested person, together with deposit of an authenticated copy of the will and of the statement probating it from the office or court where it was first probated.

A will from a place that does not provide for probate of a will after death and that is not eligible for probate under (a) of this section, may be probated in this state upon receipt by the registrar of a duly authenticated copy of the will and a duly authenticated certificate of its legal custodian that the copy filed is a true copy and that the will has become operative under the law of the other place.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 19, ch. 75, SLA 1996, provides, in regard to the amendment of subsection (c) by § 6, ch. 75, SLA 1996, as follows: “(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section or in this Act,

“(1) this Act applies to the governing instruments executed by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997;

“(2) this Act applies to a proceeding in court pending on or begun on or after January 1, 1997, regardless of the time of the death of the decedent, except to the extent that in the opinion of the court the former procedure should be made applicable in a particular case in the interest of justice or because of the infeasibility of applying the procedures of this Act;

“(3) an act done before January 1, 1997, in any proceeding and an accrued right are not impaired by this Act; if a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that began to run under a statute before January 1, 1997, the provisions of the statute apply to that right on and after January 1, 1997;

“(4) a rule of construction or presumption provided in this Act, applies to governing instruments executed before January 1, 1997, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

“(b) AS

13.33.301

,

13.33.302

,

13.33.303

,

13.33.304

,

13.33.305

,

13.33.306

,

13.33.307

,

13.33.308

,

13.33.309

, and

13.33.310

, enacted by sec. 12 of this Act, apply to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before, on, or after January 1, 1997, by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997.

“(c) In this section, ‘court,’ ‘governing instrument,’ and ‘proceeding’ have the meanings given in AS

13.06.050

, amended by sec. 2 of this Act.”

Sec. 13.16.095.
Informal probate; unavailable in certain cases.

Applications for informal probate that relate to one or more of a known series of testamentary instruments, other than wills and codicils, the latest of which does not expressly revoke the earlier, shall be declined.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.100.
Informal probate; registrar not satisfied.

If the registrar is not satisfied that a will is entitled to be probated in informal proceedings because of failure to meet the requirements of AS

13.16.090

and

13.16.095

or any other reason, the registrar may decline the application.
A declination of informal probate is not an adjudication and does not preclude formal probate proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.105.
Informal probate; notice requirements; information distribution.

The moving party must give notice as described by AS

13.06.110

of the party’s application for informal probate (1) to any person demanding it under AS

13.16.070

, and (2) to any personal representative of the decedent whose appointment has not been terminated. No other notice of informal probate is required.

If an informal probate is granted, within 30 days the applicant shall give written information of the probate to the heirs and devisees. The information shall include the name and address of the applicant, the name and location of the court granting the informal probate, and the date of the probate. The information shall be delivered or sent by ordinary mail to each of the heirs and devisees whose address is reasonably available to the applicant. No duty to give information is incurred if a personal representative is appointed who is required to give the written information required by AS

13.16.360

. An applicant’s failure to give information as required by this section is a breach of a duty to the heirs and devisees but does not affect the validity of the probate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 154 SLA 1976)

Sec. 13.16.110.
Informal appointment proceedings; delay in order; duty of registrar; effect of appointment.

Upon receipt of an application for informal appointment of a personal representative other than a special administrator as provided in AS

13.16.310

, if at least 120 hours have elapsed since the decedent’s death, the registrar, after making the findings required by AS

13.16.115

, shall appoint the applicant subject to qualification and acceptance; however, if the decedent was a nonresident, the registrar shall delay the order of appointment until 30 days have elapsed since death unless the personal representative appointed at the decedent’s domicile is the applicant, or unless the decedent’s will directs that the estate be subject to the laws of this state.

The status of personal representative and the powers and duties pertaining to the office are fully established by informal appointment. An appointment, and the office of personal representative created thereby, is subject to termination as provided in AS

13.16.280

—

13.16.300

, but is not subject to retroactive vacation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.115.
Informal appointment proceedings; determinations required; denial of application.

In informal appointment proceedings, the registrar must determine whether

the application for informal appointment of a personal representative is complete;

the applicant has made oath or affirmation that the statements contained in the application are true to the best of the applicant’s knowledge and belief;

the applicant appears from the application to be an interested person as defined in AS

13.06.050

;

on the basis of the statements in the application, venue is proper;

any will to which the requested appointment relates has been formally or informally probated; but this requirement does not apply to the appointment of a special administrator;

any notice required by AS

13.16.070

has been given;

from the statements in the application, the person whose appointment is sought has priority entitling the person to the appointment.

Unless AS

13.16.300

controls, the application must be denied if it indicates that a personal representative who has not filed a written statement of resignation as provided in AS

13.16.290(c)

has been appointed in a judicial district of this state, that, unless the applicant is the domiciliary personal representative or the personal representative’s nominee, the decedent was not domiciled in this state and that a personal representative whose appointment has not been terminated has been appointed by a court in the state of domicile, or that other requirements of this section have not been met.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Sec. 13.16.120.
Informal appointment proceedings; registrar not satisfied.

If the registrar is not satisfied that a requested informal appointment of a personal representative should be made because of failure to meet the requirements of AS

13.16.110

and

13.16.115

, or for any other reason, the registrar may decline the application.
A declination of informal appointment is not an adjudication and does not preclude appointment in formal proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.125.
Informal appointment proceedings; notice requirements.

The moving party must give notice as described by AS

13.06.110

of intention to seek an appointment informally (1) to any person demanding it under AS

13.16.070

; and (2) to any person having a prior or equal right to appointment not waived in writing and filed with the court.
No other notice of an informal appointment proceeding is required.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.130.
Informal appointment unavailable in certain cases.

If an application for informal appointment indicates the existence of a possible unrevoked testamentary instrument that may relate to property subject to the laws of this state, and that is not filed for probate in this court, the registrar shall decline the application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)